North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-21 General Provisions

36-21-01.
Fraudulent registration or representation of purebred livestock — Penalty.

It is a class B misdemeanor for a person to:

Fraudulently represent any animal as purebred;

Post or publish, or cause to be posted or published, any false pedigree or certificate;

Procure by fraud, false pretense, or misrepresentation, the registration of any animal to be used for service, sale, or exchange in this state, for the purpose of deception as to the animal’s pedigree;

Sell, or otherwise dispose of, any animal as a purebred when the person knows or has reason to believe that the animal is not the offspring of a regularly registered purebred sire and dam; or

Sell, or otherwise dispose of, any animal as a registered purebred using a false pedigree or certificate of registration.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 138, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 7267; R.C. 1899, § 7267; R.C. 1905, § 9007; S.L. 1913, ch. 244; C.L. 1913, § 9722; R.C. 1943, § 36-2101; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 396; 2017, ch. 68, § 10, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

36-21-02.
Abuse of animals prohibited — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 341, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 36-21.1 and N.D.C.C. ch. 36-21.2.

36-21-03.
Lien for caring for abused animal — Priority — Where prior lien of record exists. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 341, § 12.

36-21-04.
Unlawful killing or selling of livestock — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

36-21-05.
Skinning dead livestock — Restrictions governing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1881, ch. 60, § 8; R.C. 1895, § 1548; R.C. 1899, § 1548; R.C. 1905, § 1932; C.L. 1913, § 2616; R.C. 1943, § 36-2105; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-21-06.
Maiming or torturing animals — Misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 341, § 12.

36-21-07.
Keeping houses or pits for fighting animals — Encouraging or promoting fights between animals — Misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 341, § 12.

36-21-08.
Instigating or promoting fights between animals — Misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 341, § 12.

36-21-09.
Officer’s duty to arrest person instigating or promoting fights between animals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 341, § 12.

36-21-10.
Dogs, wolves, and coyotes worrying livestock or poultry may be killed.

Any person who kills any dog, wolf, or coyote kept as a domestic animal is not liable in any civil action to the owner of the animal:

When the person sees such animal in the act of killing, chasing, worrying, or damaging any livestock or poultry; or

When the person discovers evidence that the animal recently killed or chased sheep.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 155, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 1569; R.C. 1899, § 1569; R.C. 1905, § 1957; C.L. 1913, § 2641; S.L. 1939, ch. 13, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-2110; 2017, ch. 68, § 11, effective July 1, 2017.

36-21-11.
Liability for damages to livestock by dogs.

The owner of any dog that kills, wounds, or chases any sheep or other domestic animal or poultry belonging to another person is liable to that person for all resulting damages. If more than one dog, owned by different persons, participates in the killing, wounding, or chasing of sheep or other domestic animals or poultry, the owners of the dogs may be sued jointly, and a joint verdict and judgment may be rendered against the owners. If one or more of the defendants pays a joint judgment and if the damages committed by the dogs may be prorated, the payor or payors may receive contribution from the defendants who have not paid.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 155, § 8; R.C. 1895, § 1570; R.C. 1899, § 1570; R.C. 1905, §§ 1958, 1959; C.L. 1913, §§ 2642, 2643; S.L. 1927, ch. 252, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-2111; 2017, ch. 68, § 12, effective July 1, 2017.

36-21-12.
Killing of livestock by railroad is prima facie evidence of negligence.

The killing or damaging of any livestock by a railroad car or locomotive is prima facie evidence of negligence by the railway company or corporation.

Source:

C. Civ. P. 1877, § 679; R.C. 1895, § 2978; R.C. 1899, § 2978; R.C. 1905, § 4297; C.L. 1913, § 4644; R.C. 1943, § 36-2112; 2017, ch. 68, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

36-21-13.
Exemplary damages for injuries to domestic animals.

Exemplary damages may be applied for any wrongful injury to an animal committed willfully or by gross negligence.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1974; R.C. 1895, § 5004; R.C. 1899, § 5004; R.C. 1905, § 6589; C.L. 1913, § 7172; R.C. 1943, § 36-2113; 2017, ch. 68, § 14, effective July 1, 2017.

Collateral References.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of punitive damages in cases not involving personal injury or death, 14 A.L.R.5th 242.

36-21-14.
Licensing of weighmen — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 375, § 1.

36-21-15.
Sale of livestock by weight.

All livestock sold by weight at any public market must be sold subject to the weight at the place of sale on the day sold by the auctioneer.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 244, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 36-2115; 2017, ch. 68, § 15, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Sale of livestock by weight and satellite video livestock auction market requirements, see N.D.C.C. § 36-05.1-07.

36-21-16.
Licensing — Duration — Renewals — Refusal — Revocation or suspension. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 375, § 1.

36-21-17.
False weighing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 375, § 1.

36-21-18.
Title to property to remain with seller until settlement made.

Any person that purchases livestock at any sale conducted by an auction market established under the laws of this state must pay for the livestock with cash, check, or any other method of payment generally accepted by financial institutions in this state. For a noncash purchase and transfer of title to be valid, the financial institution of the purchaser shall honor the payment at the time of presentation.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 244, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 36-2118; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2017, ch. 68, § 16, effective July 1, 2017.

36-21-19.
Equine processing assessment — Continuing appropriation — Provision of grants.

For each equine processed at an equine processing facility in this state, the owner of the facility shall remit to the agriculture commissioner, at the time and in the manner directed by the commissioner, an assessment in the amount of five dollars. The commissioner shall forward the assessment to the state treasurer for deposit of the first fifty thousand dollars in the state general fund and any additional amount in the equine processing fund.

All moneys in the equine processing fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the agriculture commissioner to be used to:

Provide an annual grant equaling forty percent of any assessments collected to Dickinson state university in support of the equine management program;

Provide an annual grant equaling forty percent of any assessments collected to North Dakota state university in support of the equine studies program; and

Provide an annual grant equaling twenty percent of any assessments collected to public or private entities conducting equine research or offering hippotherapy to individuals with disabilities.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 298, § 1; 2017, ch. 68, § 17, effective July 1, 2017.